Maryland, session 2026, HB0111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–701.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in § 5–705.1 of this subtitle, in this subtitle the
following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Abuse” means:
(i) the physical or mental injury of a child under circumstances that
indicate that the child’s health or welfare is harmed or at substantial risk of being harmed
[by:
1. a parent;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0111*

HOUSE BILL 111
2. a household member or family member;
3. a person who has permanent or temporary care or custody
of the child;
4. a person who has responsibility for supervision of the
child; or
5. a person who, because of the person’s position or
occupation, exercises authority over the child];
(ii) sexual abuse of a child, whether physical injuries are sustained
or not; or
(iii) labor trafficking of a child [by any individual].
(2) “Abuse” does not include the physical injury of a child by accidental
means.
(c) “Administration” means the Social Services Administration of the
Department.
(d) “Centralized confidential database” means the Department’s confidential
computerized data system that contains information regarding child abuse and neglect
investigations and assessments.
(e) “Child” means any individual under the age of 18 years.
[(g)] (F) (1) “Educator or human service worker” means any professional
employee of any correctional, public, parochial or private educational, health, juvenile
service, social or social service agency, institution, or licensed facility.
(2) “Educator or human service worker” includes:
(i) any teacher;
(ii) any counselor;
(iii) any social worker;
(iv) any caseworker; and
(v) any probation or parole officer.
[(h) “Family member” means a relative by blood, adoption, or marriage of a child.

HOUSE BILL 111 3
(i)] (G) (1) “Health practitioner” includes any person who is authorized to
practice healing under the Health Occupations Article or § 13–516 of the Education Article.
(2) “Health practitioner” does not include an emergency medical
dispatcher.
[(j)] (H) “Household” means the location:
(1) in which the child resides;
(2) where the abuse or neglect is alleged to have taken place; or
(3) where the person suspected of abuse or neglect resides.
[(k) “Household member” means a person who lives with, or is a regular presence
in, a home of a child at the time of the alleged abuse or neglect.
(l)] (I) “Indicated” means a finding that there is credible evidence, which has not been
satisfactorily refuted, that abuse, neglect, or sexual abuse did occur.
[(m)] (J) “Labor trafficking” means knowingly:
(1) taking, placing, harboring, persuading, inducing, or enticing a child by
force, fraud, or coercion to provide services or labor; or
(2) receiving a benefit or thing of value from the provision of services or
labor by a child that was induced by force, fraud, or coercion.
[(n)] (K) (1) “Law enforcement agency” means a State, county, or municipal
police department, bureau, or agency.
(2) “Law enforcement agency” includes:
(i) a State, county, or municipal police department or agency;
(ii) a sheriff’s office;
(iii) a State’s Attorney’s office; and
(iv) the Attorney General’s office.
[(o)] (L) Except as provided in §§ 5–705.1 and 5–714 of this subtitle, “local
department” means the local department that has jurisdiction in the county:
(1) where the allegedly abused or neglected child lives; or

HOUSE BILL 111
(2) if different, where the abuse or neglect is alleged to have taken place.
[(p)] (M) “Local department case file” means that component of the Department’s
confidential computerized database that contains information regarding child abuse and
neglect investigations to which access is limited to the local department staff responsible
for the investigation.
[(q)] (N) “Local State’s Attorney” means the State’s Attorney for the county:
(1) where the allegedly abused or neglected child lives; or
(2) if different, where the abuse or neglect is alleged to have taken place.
[(r)] (O) “Mental injury” means the observable, identifiable, and substantial
impairment of a child’s mental or psychological ability to function caused by an intentional
act or series of acts, regardless of whether there was an intent to harm the child.
[(s)] (P) “Neglect” means the leaving of a child unattended or other failure to
give proper care and attention to a child by any parent or other person who has permanent
or temporary care or custody or responsibility for supervision of the child under
circumstances that indicate:
(1) that the child’s health or welfare is harmed or placed at substantial risk
of harm; or
(2) mental injury to the child or a substantial risk of mental injury.
[(t)] (Q) “Police officer” means any State or local officer who is authorized to
make arrests as part of the officer’s official duty.
[(u)] (R) “Record” means the original or any copy of any documentary material,
in any form, including a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, that is made by, received
by, or received from the State, a county, or a municipal corporation in the State, or any
subdivision or agency concerning a case of alleged child abuse or neglect.
[(v)] (S) “Report” means an allegation of abuse or neglect, made or received
under this subtitle.
[(w)] (T) “Ruled out” means a finding that abuse, neglect, or sexual abuse did not
occur.
[(x)] (U) “Sex trafficking” means the recruitment, harboring, transportation,
provision, obtaining, patronizing, or soliciting of a child for the purpose of a commercial sex
act.
[(y)] (V) “Sexual abuse” means any act that involves:

HOUSE BILL 111 5
(1) sexual molestation or exploitation of a child [by:
(i) a parent;
(ii) a household member or family member;
(iii) a person who has permanent or temporary care or custody of the
child;
(iv) a person who has responsibility for supervision of the child; or
(v) a person who, because of the person’s position or occupation,
exercises authority over the child]; or
(2) sex trafficking of a child [by any individual].
[(z)] (W) “Sexual molestation or exploitation” includes:
(1) allowing or encouraging a child to engage in:
(i) obscene photography, films, poses, or similar activity;
(ii) pornographic photography, films, poses, or similar activity; or
(iii) prostitution;
(2) incest;
(3) rape;
(4) sexual offense in any degree; and
(5) any other sexual conduct that is a crime.
[(aa)] (X) “Unsubstantiated” means a finding that there is an insufficient amount
of evidence to support a finding of indicated or ruled out.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.